Hawaii statutes.
§452-11 Assistance to board. The board
may call to its aid any person or persons of established reputation and known
ability in their profession, for the purpose of conducting examinations,
inspection, and investigations of all persons affected by this chapter. [L
1947, c 192, §11; RL 1955, §63-11; HRS §452-11; am L 1980, c 208, §13]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next